Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. General Licensing Provisions
§ 33-28-112.
Enjoining violations of chapter; penalties for violation of injunction.

Any person who violates or proposes to violate any provisions of this act, or any rules and regulations promulgated under this act, may be restrained or enjoined from the action at any time by an order issued by the district court. An action may be initiated by the attorney general or the district attorney for the county in which the violation has or is about to occur.

Any defendant so enjoined who violates an injunction shall be punished for contempt of court by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months or both.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.12; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

§ 33-28-113.
Contested cases; independent hearing officers; appeals.

The commission may contract with independent hearing officers to hear all contested cases arising under this act. The hearing officer shall not be an employee of the office of the attorney general, or an employee or member of the commission.

All hearings shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

]. A hearing officer has the power specified in W.S. 16-3-112(b). The hearing officer shall make in each contested case and forward to the commission written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Any judicial review of the administrative decision under the Administrative Procedure Act may be in the district court in the county where the violation allegedly occurred.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.13; Laws 1973, ch. 151, § 1; 1983, ch. 156, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

§ 33-28-114.
Conducting business without license prohibited; penalties; civil liability.

Any individual performing real estate activity without first obtaining a license is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months. Upon conviction of a subsequent violation the individual shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year or both. If a corporation, partnership or association is convicted it shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

If any person receives any money or the equivalent thereof as a fee, compensation or profit by or in consequence of a violation of any provision of this act, he shall, in addition, be liable to a penalty of not less than the amount of the sum of money so received and not more than three (3) times the sum so received as may be determined by the court, which penalty may be recovered in a court of competent jurisdiction by any person aggrieved.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.14; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), increased the fines, and added “partnership or association”; and in (b), deleted “commission” after “as a fee.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Out-of-state broker may cooperate with in-state broker. —

The purpose of this chapter, protecting the public, is not violated when a broker, licensed in another state, cooperates with a broker licensed in the state, where a sale occurs, in procuring a purchaser, but does not actually conduct negotiations in Wyoming. Bowlerama, Inc. v. Woodside Realty Co., 752 P.2d 1377,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. Apr. 28, 1988).

The award of punitive damages is solely in the discretion of the trial court.

Cates v. Daniels, 628 P.2d 862,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1981).

And cannot be awarded on appeal. —

When the trial court as fact finder does not award punitive damages, an appellate court cannot change such finding or remand it for determination. Cates v. Daniels, 628 P.2d 862,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1981).

Applied

in

McCoy v. Thompson, 677 P.2d 839,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Erickson v. Magill, 713 P.2d 1182,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 476

(Wyo. 1986); Squaw Mt. Cattle Co. v. Bowen, 804 P.2d 1292,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transactions within public security or guaranty fund designed to compensate those suffering damage or loss on account of real-estate brokers' defalcations, 38 ALR4th 792.

§ 33-28-115.
Unlicensed person may not maintain action for fee.

No action or suit shall be instituted, nor recovery be had, in any court of this state by any person for compensation for any real estate activity unless the person was licensed by the commission under this act at the time of engaging in real estate activity.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.15; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the section, changing the description of acts covered by the section.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “by the commission” near the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Unlicensed person cannot sue for commission. —

Where a person was not a licensed real estate broker in the state of Wyoming, the contract between that person and another to sell a business, the assets of which included leases from an airport board, was void and any actions taken by the unlicensed person to sell the business were unlawful and the unlicensed person was prevented from bringing action for his commission under the laws of Wyoming. Doran v. Imeson Aviation, Inc., 419 F. Supp. 586, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13489 (D. Wyo. 1976).

Single transaction by unlicensed person is violation barring compensation. —

See same catchline in notes to §

33-28-101

.

Suit by licensee sharing with unlicensed person held not affected. —

In action by licensed broker for his commission for sale of real estate, fact that broker had agreed to share his commission with an unlicensed person was held of no consequence. Foley v. Hassey, 55 Wyo. 24, 95 P.2d 85,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Quoted

in

Richardson v. Schaub, 796 P.2d 1304,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 33-28-116.
Real estate institutes and seminars; assistance in sponsoring studies and programs.

The commission may conduct or assist in conducting real estate institutes and seminars and incur and pay the necessary expenses in connection therewith. The institutes or seminars shall be open to all licensees and the public.

The commission is authorized to assist libraries and educational institutions in sponsoring studies and programs for the purpose of raising the standards of the real estate business and the competency of licensees.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.16; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

§ 33-28-117.
Directory of licensees.

The commission shall maintain and make publicly available a directory of licensees, including licenses suspended and revoked which shall contain other data as the commission may determine to be in the interest of real estate licensees and the public.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 251, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 33-355.17; Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 2; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “maintain and make publicly available” for “annually publish,” deleted “a list of” after “including,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The lists shall be distributed to all licensed brokers without charge.”

Severability. —

Section 18, ch. 251, Laws 1971, reads: “If any provision of this act is held invalid, that provision shall be deemed to be excised from this act and the invalidity thereof shall not affect any other provisions of this act. If the application of any provisions of this act to any person or circumstance is held invalid it shall not affect the application of such provision to such persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held invalid.”

§ 33-28-118.
License renewals; continuing education; payment of fees; effect of failure to renew; inactive status.

Licenses issued under this act may be renewed for successive three (3) year periods. The commission may establish a grace period for license renewal not to exceed sixty (60) days. The commission may establish a late fee for license renewal not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

The commission may adopt rules and regulations providing for mandatory continuing education allocable over each three (3) year period not to exceed sixty (60) hours.

Failure to timely submit a complete renewal application including proof of required continuing education and renewal fees when due shall automatically cause a license to expire. Presentation of a check to the commission as a fee for either an original or renewal license or for examination for license, which is returned to the state treasurer unpaid, is cause for revocation or denial of license unless it is established that the dishonor of the check was not the fault of the applicant or licensee.

Any licensee whose license has expired as provided in this section after the grace period has ended, shall comply with all requirements of a new applicant, including writing the appropriate examination, before a license will be reissued.

Any real estate associate broker or salesperson who is not employed by or associated with a responsible broker, or any responsible broker who desires to become inactive, may renew his license in an inactive status prior to the renewal deadline established in this section, by submitting the renewal fee together with a completed renewal application on which he has noted his present inactive status.

A license on inactive status for more than three (3) years shall not be reissued on an active status unless the licensee has first met the educational requirements under subsection (b) of this section.

A license on an inactive status for less than three (3) years may be renewed on an active status prior to the renewal deadline by submitting the renewal fee together with a renewal application.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2005, ch. 96, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), added the final two sentences

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted the former second and third sentences, providing for timing of application for renewal of licenses; in (b), deleted “Effective December 31, 2983” at the beginning; in (c), substituted the first sentence for the former first sentence, which read: “Failure to remit renewal fees when due shall automatically cancel a license, but otherwise the license shall remain in full force and effect continuously from the date of issuance, unless suspended or revoked by the commission for just cause”; and in (d), in addition to making stylistic changes, added “after the grace period has ended.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (e), substituted gender-neutral terms.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

§ 33-28-119.
Advertising; licensing under one name; trade names; advertisement of licensees.

Every real estate licensee, when promoting himself as a licensee, advertising or promoting his real estate activities, shall use the real estate company name under which he is licensed by the commission and shall use no slogans or phraseology in a manner which would indicate or suggest to the public that real estate may be listed or is being offered for sale, exchange, lease or rent by a private party not licensed by the commission.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

No person shall act or advertise as a licensee in this state by use of letterheads, billboards, radio or television announcements or any other media of advertising, without first obtaining a license from the commission.

No person shall conduct or promote a real estate company other than the real estate company under which the person or company is licensed by the commission.

A trade name, with the permission of the owner of the trade name, may be used concurrently with the licensed name of the real estate company in the promotion or conduct of the responsible broker’s business. On promotional materials the real estate company name shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner that the general public may easily identify, as prescribed in commission rules.

A licensed responsible broker shall not advertise the sale, purchase, exchange or lease of real estate, unless owned by him, without including in the advertisement the real estate company name under which he is licensed by the commission.

A licensed associate broker or salesperson shall not advertise the sale, purchase, exchange or lease of real estate, unless owned by him, without including in the advertisement the real estate company name under which he is licensed by the commission.

A licensee shall not advertise the sale, purchase, exchange or lease of real estate owned by the licensee unless the advertisement includes the fact that an owner of the real estate is a licensee.

If a licensee uses his individual name in advertising, the first and last name shall be included. A common shortened spelling of the first name of the licensee is permitted. The use of a nickname is permitted if the nickname is reflected on the license.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in addition to making stylistic changes, repealed former (b), which read: “No real estate broker licensed under this act shall insert in any publication an advertisement which lists only a post office box number, telephone number or street address”; in (f) and (g), substituted “real estate, unless” for “property, whether”; in (g), deleted “and licensed and the name under which he is licensed” after “is associated”; and added (h) and (j).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) added “promoting himself as a licensee” and “by the commission” to the first sentence; rewrote (d), which formerly read: “Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, no person shall be licensed
under more than one (1) real estate company name, and no person shall conduct or promote a real estate brokerage business except under the real estate company name under which the person or brokerage business is licensed”; in (e) added “On promotional materials”, added “the general public”, substituted “easily identify, as prescribed in the commission rules” for “be readily identified by the general public” at the end; in (f) added “by the commission”; in (g) substituted “real estate company name under which he is licensed by the commission” for “name of the real estate company with whom he is associated”;
substituted gender-neutral
terms, and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-28-120.
Assistance of attorney general; independent counsel.

The attorney general shall render opinions to the commission on all questions of law relating to the interpretation and administration of this act. The attorney general shall act as attorney for the commission in all actions and proceedings brought by or against it under this act.

In addition to or instead of the attorney general the commission may hire other legal counsel with the approval of the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

§ 33-28-121.
Temporary licenses to complete affairs of deceased brokers.

In the event of the death of a responsible broker who is the sole proprietor of a real estate company, upon application by his personal representative, the director shall issue, without examination and for a specified period of time, a temporary license to the personal representative, or to a licensed individual designated by him and approved by the director. The license shall authorize the holder of the temporary license to continue to transact business for the sole purpose of completing the affairs of the deceased responsible broker.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the director of the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “responsible” for “licensed,” substituted “company” for “business,” and added “responsible” after “the deceased.”

§ 33-28-122.
Responsible broker's trust accounts; disposition of interest; commingling with personal funds prohibited; disputed deposits; cooperative transactions.

Every responsible broker licensed by the commission in this state shall comply with the following provisions for each licensed real estate company he supervises:

Maintain an account in a financial institution in this state designated as a trust or escrow account in which all down payments, earnest money deposits, advance listing fees or other trust funds received by him, his associate brokers or his salespersons on behalf of a principal or any other person shall be deposited unless all persons having an interest in the funds have agreed otherwise in writing. The account shall permit immediate withdrawal of the funds deposited therein. In lieu of maintaining a trust or escrow account under this paragraph, a responsible broker may use a funds holder;

Notify the real estate commission on forms it prescribes of the name of the financial institution in which a trust account is maintained and the name of the account. If the responsible broker uses a funds holder and deposits monies with the funds holder, his intention to use a funds holder and the name of the funds holder shall be disclosed to all parties to any contract, purchase agreement, lease or lease agreement negotiated by him. The responsible broker shall identify all funds holders used by the broker and notify the real estate commission in writing that he uses and deposits monies with the funds holder;

Permit the commission or its representative to examine the responsible broker’s trust accounting records;

Upon cancellation of his license for any reason, maintain the trust account until all deposits have been properly disbursed.

If a responsible broker’s branch office maintains a separate trust account, the office shall maintain a separate bookkeeping system.

A trust account maintained by a responsible broker under this section may be interest bearing or noninterest bearing. Any interest accrued on any deposit in a trust account shall be paid out as agreed in writing by all persons having an interest in the deposit. In the absence of a written agreement among all persons having an interest in the deposit, at the time all or any portion of any deposit is withdrawn and paid out, all interest accrued upon the funds withdrawn and paid out shall also be withdrawn and paid out to the person from whom the trust funds were received; provided, if the funds are required to be disbursed to more than one (1) person, each person entitled to receive any portion of the deposit shall also be paid a portion of the interest in the same proportion as the funds withdrawn and paid out to each person bears to the total deposit.

A licensee is not entitled to any part of the earnest money or other item of value given to him in connection with any real estate transaction as part or all of his compensation or fee until the transaction has been consummated or terminated.

No responsible broker shall permit an advance payment of funds belonging to others to be deposited in the responsible broker’s personal account or be commingled with his personal funds. It will not be considered commingling if, when establishing the trust account, the responsible broker deposits some of his funds to keep the account open or to avoid charges for a minimum balance, so long as that deposit is identified at the time of deposit. No responsible broker shall use deposits in a trust account for a purpose other than the transaction for which they were provided.

In the event of a dispute over the return or forfeiture of any deposit held by a responsible broker, the responsible broker shall continue to hold the deposit in a trust account until he has a written release from the parties consenting to its disposition, until a civil action is filed or the responsible broker interpleads all parties, at which time it may be paid to the court.

Unless otherwise agreed by all parties to the contract, in a cooperative transaction in which the responsible broker working with a buyer receives cash or a check as earnest money, the responsible broker shall deliver the contract and the cash or check to the responsible broker working with the seller who shall deposit the cash or check in his trust account. If the responsible broker working with a buyer receives a promissory note, or thing of value, the note or thing of value shall be delivered with the contract to the responsible broker working with the seller, who shall hold the note or thing of value.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in addition to making stylistic and related changes, in (a)(i), added “or escrow,” and added the present last sentence; rewrote (a)(ii), changing references of closing agents to funds holders or variants; in (f), added “or the responsible broker interpleads all parties”; and rewrote (g), which formerly read: “In a cooperative transaction, in which one (1) broker holds an exclusive right to sell or an exclusive agency on a property and the selling broker receives cash or a check as earnest money or according to a contract, the selling broker shall deliver the contract and the earnest money to the listing broker who shall deposit the cash or check in his trust account. If the selling broker receives a promissory note, or thing of value, the note or thing of value shall be delivered with the contract to the listing broker to be held by the listing broker.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a), which formerly read: “Every responsible broker licensed in this state shall,” in (a)(i) substituted “maintain an account” for “maintain a separate account”; and substituted a
gender-neutral term.

Dispute over deposit. —

Use of word “may” in subsection (f) of this section did not give broker discretion to disburse deposit upon request of only one party, and where broker clearly had notice of dispute between parties, broker was required to either hold deposit or pay it to court. Saulcy Land Co. v. Jones, 983 P.2d 1200,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1999).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 95.

§ 33-28-123.
Retention of records.

Every responsible broker licensed by the commission in this state shall keep and maintain a full set of records of every real estate transaction in which he participates on behalf of or to assist any party to the transaction. The records shall be maintained not less than two (2) years from the latest date on which the real estate company participated in the transaction.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 15, § 1; 2009, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “seven (7) years” for “ten (10) years” in the second sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “responsible,” added “or to assist,” and substituted “real estate company” for “broker.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “by the commission” near the beginning.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “two (2)” for “seven (7).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 15, § 1, and
Laws 2000, ch. 16, § 1, both enacted
§

33-28-123

. Laws 2000, ch. 16, § 1, was subsequently redesignated as
§

33-28-124

by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

§ 33-28-124.
Act, error or omission in the rendering of real estate services.

A cause of action arising from an act, error or omission in the rendering of services provided by a licensee under this act shall be brought within the time limits provided under W.S.

1-3-107

. Nothing in this section shall be construed to extend the limitation period specified in W.S.

33-28-203

for actions for payment from the real estate recovery account.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 16, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 15, § 1, and Laws 2000, ch. 16, § 1, both enacted §

33-28-123

. This section was subsequently redesignated as §

33-28-124

by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).

Time limitations. —

A claim against a realtor is a claim for professional negligence, and realtors are licensed professionals who fall within the scope of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a); accordingly, the two-year limitations period of that section applies to all claims against realtors, even those that arose prior to July 1, 2000. Rawlinson v. Greer, 2003 WY 28, 64 P.3d 120,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Hulse v. BHJ, Inc., 2003 WY 75, 71 P.3d 262,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 33-28-125.
Broker's price opinions.

A licensee may prepare a broker’s price opinion:

To a potential seller or third party, recommending a listing price of real estate;

To a potential buyer or third party, recommending a purchase price of real estate; or

To any third party, for any purpose permitted by law.

Every printed or electronic broker’s price opinion prepared as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall include the statement: “This is an opinion of price and is not a certified appraisal of the market value of the property. If such an appraisal is desired, the service of a certified appraiser must be obtained.”

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 68, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 68, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.